North Dakota, session 69, HB1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 27-20.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Mandatory drug testing.
1. If abuse of a controlled substance, chemical substance, or the presence of drug
paraphernalia is a contributing factor to a finding that a child is in need of protection
resulting in ou t - o f - home placement, the human service zone shall require the parent to
pass a drug test before an unsupervised visit with the child.
2. The department of health and human services may require additional drug testing as
needed for safety planning.
3. This section does not apply to marijuana.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
DRUG TESTING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $95,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of drug testing by
the human service zones, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 1 25.0946.02000